lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1950 Y 1
SFX 1950 0 ile's .
SFX 3898 Y 1
SFX 3898 0 nity .
SFX 2714 Y 1
SFX 2714 0 ria's .
SFX 4849 Y 1
SFX 4849 0 nora's .
SFX 4370 Y 1
SFX 4370 0 vents .
SFX 390 Y 1
SFX 390 0 ker's .
SFX 4860 Y 1
SFX 4860 0 nize .
SFX 4200 Y 1
SFX 4200 0 ension .
SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 0 cloth .
SFX 3996 Y 1
SFX 3996 0 lier's .
SFX 1958 Y 1
SFX 1958 0 idities .
SFX 3943 Y 1
SFX 3943 0 mistresses .
SFX 2441 Y 1
SFX 2441 0 lied .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 0 lier .
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 0 lies .
SFX 1371 Y 1
SFX 1371 0 tingly .
SFX 3546 Y 1
SFX 3546 0 arians .
SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 0 like .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 0 ables .
SFX 461 Y 1
SFX 461 0 ch's .
SFX 2035 Y 1
SFX 2035 0 ariness .
SFX 4141 Y 1
SFX 4141 0 goer's .
SFX 1398 Y 1
SFX 1398 0 rings .
SFX 1509 Y 1
SFX 1509 0 -time .
SFX 1041 Y 1
SFX 1041 0 yn's .
SFX 4496 Y 1
SFX 4496 0 thiness's .
SFX 3526 Y 1
SFX 3526 0 can's .
SFX 1147 Y 1
SFX 1147 0 lise .
SFX 3319 Y 1
SFX 3319 0 lish .
SFX 2811 Y 1
SFX 2811 0 lism .
SFX 1146 Y 1
SFX 1146 0 list .
SFX 3886 Y 1
SFX 3886 0 ocations .
SFX 3842 Y 1
SFX 3842 0 pelled .
SFX 2979 Y 1
SFX 2979 0 -two .
SFX 1771 Y 1
SFX 1771 0 ett's .
SFX 2309 Y 1
SFX 2309 0 trap's .
SFX 2267 Y 1
SFX 2267 0 ager's .
SFX 2725 Y 1
SFX 2725 0 rally .
SFX 1267 Y 1
SFX 1267 0 -minded .
SFX 504 Y 1
SFX 504 0 tions .
SFX 2599 Y 1
SFX 2599 0 weed's .
SFX 4176 Y 1
SFX 4176 0 esters .
SFX 2587 Y 1
SFX 2587 0 zer's .
SFX 4197 Y 1
SFX 4197 0 eousness's .
SFX 1878 Y 1
SFX 1878 0 poort .
SFX 1312 Y 1
SFX 1312 0 lized .
SFX 3988 Y 1
SFX 3988 0 lizer .
SFX 1567 Y 1
SFX 1567 0 lizes .
SFX 3738 Y 1
SFX 3738 0 shooting .
SFX 4696 Y 1
SFX 4696 0 ricate .
SFX 4586 Y 1
SFX 4586 0 sives .
SFX 4042 Y 1
SFX 4042 0 ivists .
SFX 3361 Y 1
SFX 3361 0 iners .
SFX 2430 Y 1
SFX 2430 0 lynn's .
SFX 1183 Y 1
SFX 1183 0 x's .
SFX 3288 Y 1
SFX 3288 0 mount .
SFX 2228 Y 1
SFX 2228 0 eters .
SFX 2008 Y 1
SFX 2008 0 di's .
SFX 2013 Y 1
SFX 2013 0 cocks .
SFX 1449 Y 1
SFX 1449 0 ish's .
SFX 4406 Y 1
SFX 4406 0 ults .
SFX 1169 Y 1
SFX 1169 0 ene's .
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 0 essed .
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 esses .
SFX 2393 Y 1
SFX 2393 0 ol's .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 ding's .
SFX 1430 Y 1
SFX 1430 0 mouth .
SFX 494 Y 1
SFX 494 0 ate's .
SFX 3938 Y 1
SFX 3938 0 mouths .
SFX 1261 Y 1
SFX 1261 0 boy's .
SFX 2862 Y 1
SFX 2862 0 ida .
SFX 352 Y 1
SFX 352 0 ide .
SFX 1743 Y 1
SFX 1743 0 ids .
SFX 4089 Y 1
SFX 4089 0 iff .
SFX 621 Y 1
SFX 621 0 ify .
SFX 1881 Y 1
SFX 1881 0 place .
SFX 1930 Y 1
SFX 1930 0 ky's .
SFX 1758 Y 1
SFX 1758 0 hier .
SFX 2678 Y 1
SFX 2678 0 sley .
SFX 4350 Y 1
SFX 4350 0 worthiness' .
SFX 4081 Y 1
SFX 4081 0 ila .
SFX 2721 Y 1
SFX 2721 0 rence .
SFX 533 Y 1
SFX 533 0 ile .
SFX 1740 Y 1
SFX 1740 0 ill .
SFX 1458 Y 1
SFX 1458 0 ils .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 ily .
SFX 985 Y 1
SFX 985 0 ya's .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 0 ina .
SFX 162 Y 1
SFX 162 0 ine .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 ing .
SFX 3360 Y 1
SFX 3360 0 ini .
SFX 1451 Y 1
SFX 1451 0 ino .
SFX 4582 Y 1
SFX 4582 0 slip .
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 0 ins .
SFX 3723 Y 1
SFX 3723 0 spring's .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 ing's .
SFX 4317 Y 1
SFX 4317 0 ada's .
SFX 2597 Y 1
SFX 2597 0 working .
SFX 2458 Y 1
SFX 2458 0 ire .
SFX 4066 Y 1
SFX 4066 0 irs .
SFX 957 Y 1
SFX 957 0 kiest .
SFX 743 Y 1
SFX 743 0 ita .
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 0 ite .
SFX 742 Y 1
SFX 742 0 its .
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 0 ity .
SFX 989 Y 1
SFX 989 0 skins .
SFX 1687 Y 1
SFX 1687 0 plate's .
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 0 ive .
SFX 4194 Y 1
SFX 4194 0 erest .
SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 0 ched .
SFX 692 Y 1
SFX 692 0 cher .
SFX 373 Y 1
SFX 373 0 ches .
SFX 1346 Y 1
SFX 1346 0 bone's .
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 0 ize .
SFX 4287 Y 1
SFX 4287 0 ature's .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 edness .
SFX 3825 Y 1
SFX 3825 0 pus's .
SFX 91 Y 1
SFX 91 0 izing .
SFX 2898 Y 1
SFX 2898 0 folds .
SFX 1539 Y 1
SFX 1539 0 plays .
SFX 4495 Y 1
SFX 4495 0 thinesses .
SFX 2577 Y 1
SFX 2577 0 -thirds .
SFX 559 Y 1
SFX 559 0 ishness's .
SFX 4590 Y 1
SFX 4590 0 sighted .
SFX 4499 Y 1
SFX 4499 0 thesis's .
SFX 2594 Y 1
SFX 2594 0 worthiness .
SFX 907 Y 1
SFX 907 0 ettes .
SFX 3800 Y 1
SFX 3800 0 rier's .
SFX 2257 Y 1
SFX 2257 0 aw's .
SFX 1136 Y 1
SFX 1136 0 ory's .
SFX 4154 Y 1
SFX 4154 0 file .
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 k's .
SFX 3068 Y 1
SFX 3068 0 tream .
SFX 2224 Y 1
SFX 2224 0 fing .
SFX 3755 Y 1
SFX 3755 0 selling .
SFX 2995 Y 1
SFX 2995 0 -nine .
SFX 3390 Y 1
SFX 3390 0 ications .
SFX 2635 Y 1
SFX 2635 0 trees .
SFX 960 Y 1
SFX 960 0 ionist's .
SFX 2569 Y 1
SFX 2569 0 anced .
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 0 ances .
SFX 1030 Y 1
SFX 1030 0 bird's .
SFX 4989 Y 1
SFX 4989 0 lement .
SFX 1333 Y 1
SFX 1333 0 fire .
SFX 4134 Y 1
SFX 4134 0 headedly .
SFX 1669 Y 1
SFX 1669 0 sburg .
SFX 2889 Y 1
SFX 2889 0 girls .
SFX 712 Y 1
SFX 712 0 ide's .
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 0 osition .
SFX 834 Y 1
SFX 834 0 sville .
SFX 1814 Y 1
SFX 1814 0 xes .
SFX 4059 Y 1
SFX 4059 0 italised .
SFX 2374 Y 1
SFX 2374 0 positions .
SFX 2308 Y 1
SFX 2308 0 tress .
SFX 1474 Y 1
SFX 1474 0 graphy's .
SFX 2884 Y 1
SFX 2884 0 gy's .
SFX 2931 Y 1
SFX 2931 0 died .
SFX 1251 Y 1
SFX 1251 0 dier .
SFX 720 Y 1
SFX 720 0 dies .
SFX 1448 Y 1
SFX 1448 0 ished .
SFX 1940 Y 1
SFX 1940 0 isher .
SFX 1078 Y 1
SFX 1078 0 ishes .
SFX 4207 Y 1
SFX 4207 0 ements .
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 0 oles .
SFX 3708 Y 1
SFX 3708 0 stock's .
SFX 4723 Y 1
SFX 4723 0 range .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 woman .
SFX 980 Y 1
SFX 980 0 alization's .
SFX 4309 Y 1
SFX 4309 0 ander's .
SFX 340 Y 1
SFX 340 0 women .
SFX 2007 Y 1
SFX 2007 0 dish .
SFX 3211 Y 1
SFX 3211 0 print's .
SFX 4811 Y 1
SFX 4811 0 oming .
SFX 4360 Y 1
SFX 4360 0 wash's .
SFX 646 Y 1
SFX 646 0 eness .
SFX 2592 Y 1
SFX 2592 0 wright's .
SFX 3029 Y 1
SFX 3029 0 walking .
SFX 2469 Y 1
SFX 2469 0 inger .
SFX 3342 Y 1
SFX 3342 0 iving .
SFX 4291 Y 1
SFX 4291 0 art's .
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 0 elling .
SFX 1569 Y 1
SFX 1569 0 lising .
SFX 2445 Y 1
SFX 2445 0 landers .
SFX 437 Y 1
SFX 437 0 tering .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 matically .
SFX 812 Y 1
SFX 812 0 ivity .
SFX 2456 Y 1
SFX 2456 0 ition's .
SFX 1223 Y 1
SFX 1223 0 lization .
SFX 3668 Y 1
SFX 3668 0 tility .
SFX 3189 Y 1
SFX 3189 0 rence's .
SFX 1976 Y 1
SFX 1976 0 giness .
SFX 2539 Y 1
SFX 2539 0 eable .
SFX 4799 Y 1
SFX 4799 0 ony's .
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 0 bill .
SFX 666 Y 1
SFX 666 0 ishnesses .
SFX 2591 Y 1
SFX 2591 0 writer's .
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 bing .
SFX 4270 Y 1
SFX 4270 0 bins .
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 0 ities .
SFX 3266 Y 1
SFX 3266 0 nor's .
SFX 3272 Y 1
SFX 3272 0 nians .
SFX 2436 Y 1
SFX 2436 0 lity's .
SFX 1032 Y 1
SFX 1032 0 away .
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 0 bird .
SFX 3949 Y 1
SFX 3949 0 mine's .
SFX 3044 Y 1
SFX 3044 0 usion's .
SFX 3480 Y 1
SFX 3480 0 elers .
SFX 2962 Y 1
SFX 2962 0 awed .
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 ked .
SFX 2450 Y 1
SFX 2450 0 ken .
SFX 315 Y 1
SFX 315 0 ker .
SFX 2831 Y 1
SFX 2831 0 ket .
SFX 1933 Y 1
SFX 1933 0 key .
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 0 tock's .
SFX 2939 Y 1
SFX 2939 0 cie's .
SFX 1439 Y 1
SFX 1439 0 kie .
SFX 2040 Y 1
SFX 2040 0 ale's .
SFX 616 Y 1
SFX 616 0 kin .
SFX 2999 Y 1
SFX 2999 0 -ins .
SFX 1937 Y 1
SFX 1937 0 ition .
SFX 1204 Y 1
SFX 1204 0 ro's .
SFX 2055 Y 1
SFX 2055 0 walk .
SFX 2601 Y 1
SFX 2601 0 wall .
SFX 1192 Y 1
SFX 1192 0 tness .
SFX 1255 Y 1
SFX 1255 0 cy's .
SFX 1801 Y 1
SFX 1801 0 belle's .
SFX 1493 Y 1
SFX 1493 0 cer's .
SFX 4459 Y 1
SFX 4459 0 tracted .
SFX 3976 Y 1
SFX 3976 0 lness's .
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 0 dra's .
SFX 811 Y 1
SFX 811 0 maker's .
SFX 1931 Y 1
SFX 1931 0 kop .
SFX 4029 Y 1
SFX 4029 0 kos .
SFX 2320 Y 1
SFX 2320 0 tides .
SFX 416 Y 1
SFX 416 0 ward .
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 0 ware .
SFX 2448 Y 1
SFX 2448 0 kled .
SFX 2447 Y 1
SFX 2447 0 kles .
SFX 2734 Y 1
SFX 2734 0 pipe's .
SFX 1894 Y 1
SFX 1894 0 nut's .
SFX 4358 Y 1
SFX 4358 0 wave .
SFX 4949 Y 1
SFX 4949 0 luded .
SFX 3964 Y 1
SFX 3964 0 ludes .
SFX 3829 Y 1
SFX 3829 0 pring's .
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 0 ently .
SFX 2797 Y 1
SFX 2797 0 metric .
SFX 3358 Y 1
SFX 3358 0 ionable .
SFX 4954 Y 1
SFX 4954 0 locking .
SFX 635 Y 1
SFX 635 0 table .
SFX 3426 Y 1
SFX 3426 0 get's .
SFX 4919 Y 1
SFX 4919 0 mittal .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 0 iring .
