lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Leo/1,2,40,111,117,120,138,162,219,223,233,247,304,345,368,465,636,1705,1905,2410,2411,3266,3267,3925,4224,4840,4849,4850
Robb/1041,1042
Robin/1,30,33,123,133,145,158,171,187,202,282,306,321,329,526,625,858,859,1771,1772
Vito/1,875,2714
ash/1,3,4,8,9,18,34,36,69,78,83,1417,2122,2943,3526,3817,4022,4259,4724
comp/389,551,968,1172,1486,1676,1781,2356,2441,2562,2563,2564,2711,3039,3040,3175,3235,3324,3325,3545,3616,3631,3632,3633,3858,3995,3996,3997,3998,3999,4000,4001,4013
dig/2,135,276,362,402,1476,2122,3897,3898,3899
ear/1,2,3,4,5,27,32,49,71,107,108,151,159,160,184,210,232,238,269,270,279,289,359,389,432,488,519,671,776,810,1212,1213,1221,1293,1310,1398,1426,1629,1652,1866,1883,1884,2102,2137,2169,2271,2272,2425,3088,3147,3674,3675,3677,4495,4496,4497
her/2,6,8,16,21,178,184,201,216,218,283,338,364,582,695,1028,1398,1424,1866,1900,1913,1991,2420,2517,3228,3644,3756,4184,4222,4311,4441
honor/35,206,229,245,299,349,384,537,538,1809,2561,3564
lee/1,2,140,174,227,287,298,313,373,379,416,461,472,493,514
meas/5,52,88,153,232,270,3621,4004
milk/69,78,90,112,1818,2170,2427,2428,2598,2599
millennia/2811
open/2,3,4,5,9,10,11,12,14,17,29,32,38,300,350,356,964,1059,1182,1209,1267,1268,1494,1630,1973,2046,2996,3570
order/1,2,3,4,5,9,29,50,238,269,359,389
ossify/3
panel/32,59,67,73,80,126,312,1146,1147,1223,1312,1313,1314,1566,1567,1568,1569,1570,1571,1572,1573,1721
part/210,287,289,399,519,668,935,1469,1509,1753,1937,2187,2456,2481,2484,2752,2837,2866,2867,3915,4054
pill/1,2,3,4,55,60,62,167,185,195,484,561,611,641,661,682,764,823,867,917,918,920,942,943,1060,1063,1103,1136,2042,2267,2562,3545,3557
rap/1,2,3,4,8,9,14,16,21,26,34,59,67,73,109,113,162,207,223,250,251,562,568,593,713,746,892,894,1192,1279,1324,1369,1407,1538,1743,1836,1840,1956,1957,1958,2478,2479,2626,2861,3064,3229,3230,3841,3842,4324,4325,4326
rat/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,21,29,32,35,48,55,57,60,62,82,119,127,157,219,252,304,401,430,450,506,561,568,579,594,620,621,622,634,641,642,745,768,782,880,930,931,1087,1239,1370,1376,1466,1659,1838,2074,2309,2315,2460,2539,2641
rec/2,6,200,220,263,1021,1051,1337,1811,1830,2610,3113,3883,4200,4290,4831,4832
rep/1,2,5,193,232,363,389,482,593,754,861,999,1082,1160,1517,1602,1603,1640,1676,1715,1739,1776,1945,2060,2061,2319,2356,2441,2711,2741,2742,2744,2745,2821,3039,3040,3041,3174,3175,3331,3332,3333,3334,3616,3631,3632,3633,3995,3996,4290,4489,4695
rev/1,2,87,92,95,98,99,145,152,156,265,271,274,456,533,1094,1162,1186,1275,1320,1335,1612,1646,1647,1949,2473,2617,2766,2836,2910,3261,3342,3631,3632,3633,3886,4043,4058,4059,4191,4192
scintilla/1,2,48,57,147,259,436,504,505,604,657,767
second/2,3,4,5,9,12,14,41,42,44,245,537,1164,2035,2047,2561
sect/1,2,55,60,62,100,105,118,245,537,561,641,761,773,895,2749,3546,3547,4389,4390
sol/1,2,3,4,6,8,9,16,21,32,68,94,218,236,338,364,484,513,646,713,918,1112,1138,1186,1188,1189,1217,1251,1275,1324,1341,1342,1442,1443,1444,1517,1640,1743,1808,1820,1822,1956,1957,1958,2273,2478,2573,2574,2575,2861,3380,3604,4231,4292,4370
sty/1,3,46,52,88,121,125,153,168,212,524,777,951,1146,1147,1150,1223,1312,1313,1314,1559,1566,1567,1568,1569,1570,1571,1572,1573,1721,1921,3319,4946,4947,4975
table/203,273,360,873,874,876,928,1044,1491,1522,2017,2018,2032,2555,2761
text/1,2,652,721,803,927,1162,1950,2297,4394
theatre/1,2,1763,2887,4141
thin/2,5,9,10,11,16,17,38,140,151,159,200,208,210,227,289,315,337,390,455,519,643,1073,1227,1426,1899,2121,3814
thirty/1,155,2577,2578,2579,2580,2978,2979,2980,2981,2982,2983,2984,2985,2986,2987,2988,2989,2990,2991,2992,2993,2994,2995,3001,3002,3003,3004,3005,3006,3007,3008,3009,3010,3011,3012,3013
trim/2,5,9,10,12,17,231,237,409,571,615,1709,1914,1982,2167,2521,4176,4509
vent/1,2,3,4,9,12,320,342,539,567,939,1113,1208,1278,1831,2725
vulture/1,2,252,736
web/1,2,9,12,221,260,954,1066,1067,1799,1979,2950,3438,3569,3732,3943,3944,4163,4920
wit/1,2,10,11,17,48,50,57,82,116,157,164,172,196,246,298,373,401,437,447,450,461,471,472,479,487,493,500,506,718,769,879,1047,1090,1371,1523,1969,1970,1971,3671,4491,4492
